Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-830
Human trafficking; forced labor or services; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 28-830 and 28-831, the following definitions apply:

(1) Actor means a person who solicits, procures, or supervises the services or labor of another person;

(2) Commercial sexual activity means any sex act on account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or received by any person;

(3) Debt bondage means inducing another person to provide:

(a) Commercial sexual activity in payment toward or satisfaction of a real or purported debt; or

(b) Labor or services in payment toward or satisfaction of a real or purported debt if:

(i) The reasonable value of the labor or services is not applied toward the liquidation of the debt; or

(ii) The length of the labor or services is not limited and the nature of the labor or services is not defined;

(4) Financial harm means theft by extortion as described by section 28-513;

(5) Forced labor or services means labor or services that are performed or provided by another person and are obtained or maintained through:

(a) Inflicting or threatening to inflict serious personal injury, as defined by section 28-318, on another person;

(b) Physically restraining or threatening to physically restrain the other person;

(c) Abusing or threatening to abuse the legal process against another person to cause arrest or deportation for violation of federal immigration law;

(d) Controlling or threatening to control another person's access to a controlled substance listed in Schedule I, II or III of section 28-405;

(e) Exploiting another person's substantial functional impairment as defined in section 28-368 or substantial mental impairment as defined in section 28-369;

(f) Knowingly destroying, concealing, removing, confiscating, or possessing any actual or purported passport or other immigration document or any other actual or purported government identification document of the other person; or

(g) Causing or threatening to cause financial harm to another person, including debt bondage;

(6) Labor or services means work or activity of economic or financial value;

(7) Labor trafficking means knowingly recruiting, enticing, harboring, transporting, providing, or obtaining by any means or attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or obtain by any means a person eighteen years of age or older intending or knowing that the person will be subjected to forced labor or services;

(8) Labor trafficking of a minor means knowingly recruiting, enticing, harboring, transporting, providing, or obtaining by any means or attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or obtain by any means a minor intending or knowing that the minor will be subjected to forced labor or services;

(9) Maintain means, in relation to labor or services, to secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any initial agreement by the other person to perform such type of service;

(10) Minor means a person younger than eighteen years of age;

(11) Sex trafficking means knowingly recruiting, enticing, harboring, transporting, providing, soliciting, or obtaining by any means or knowingly attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, solicit, or obtain by any means a person eighteen years of age or older for the purpose of having such person engage without consent, as defined in section 28-318, in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of pornography or to cause or attempt to cause a person eighteen years of age or older to engage without consent, as defined in section 28-318, in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of pornography;

(12) Sex trafficking of a minor means knowingly recruiting, enticing, harboring, transporting, providing, soliciting, or obtaining by any means or knowingly attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, solicit, or obtain by any means a minor for the purpose of having such minor engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of pornography or to cause or attempt to cause a minor to engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of pornography;

(13) Sexually explicit performance means a live or public play, dance, show, or other exhibition intended to arouse or gratify sexual desire or to appeal to prurient interests; and

(14) Trafficking victim means a person subjected to any act or acts prohibited by section 28-831.

Laws 2006, LB 1086, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB1, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB255, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 8.